bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.dic
abordar/PRSTVX
aborrajar/PRSVWX
abstener/ORWX
acantilar/PRSTVWX
acapizar/PRSVWX
achantar/PRSVWX
acinturar/PSVWX
acocear/PSTVWX
activar/HPRSTUVWX
actuar/HLPSWX
acumular/HIPRSTVWX
adulcir/VWX
afatar/PSVWX
afeminar/HIPSVWX
aglomerar/HLPRSTVWX
agrietar/IPRSTVX
ahechar/PSVWX
ajear/PSVWX
albergar/PRSTVWX
aleznar/PSTVWX
alfeizar/PSTWX
allegar/IPRSTVX
alzar/IPRSTVWX
amajadar/PSVWX
amaromar/PSVWX
amnistiar/PSWX
amostazar/PSVWX
amuelar/PSVX
anexar/PSTVWX
apabilar/PSVWX
apalpar/PSVWX
apartar/IPRSTUVWX
apimpollar/PRSVX
apoderar/IPRSVWX
apostar/ILPRSTWX
aquejar/PSVWX
argamasar/PSVWX
arrebozar/PSVWX
arrobiñar/PSVWX
arruinar/IPRSTVWX
asquear/PSVWX
atabillar/PSVWX
atornillar/PSVWX
atrabajar/PSVWX
atravesar/PRSTUWX
aviciar/PSVX
avigorar/PSVX
azotar/IPRSTVWX
bambanear/PSVWX
banderillear/PSVWX
barriscar/PSVWX
berrear/PRSVWX
bieldar/PSVWX
bolear/PSVWX
borrar/PRSTUVWX
boyar/LPSVWX
caballear/PSVWX
cacear/PSVWX
cafetear/PSVWX
cansar/PRSVWX
capar/PSVWX
capturar/PRSTUVWX
cavilar/HPSVWX
cazar/PRSTVWX
cementar/HPSVX
charlatanear/PSVWX
chequear/PSVWX
chillar/PSVWX
circunsolar/PSVX
clausurar/PSTVWX
clavetear/PSVWX
colicuar/HPSVX
comisar/PSVWX
compatibilizar/PSVWX
concernir/LWX
confortar/HILPRSTVX
connotar/HPSTVWX
conocer/IOQRTWX
contrafirmar/LPSTVWX
contundir/VWX
conturbar/HPSVWX
cosechar/PSVWX
crepitar/HPSVWX
cristalizar/HPSVWX
cundir/VWX
danzar/LPSVWX
decidir/OQRTVWX
demarcar/HPSVWX
denegar/HPRSTWX
derramar/IPSTVWX
desacorralar/PSTVWX
desacralizar/PRSTVWX
desalquilar/PSVWX
desanclar/PSVWX
desangrar/IPRSTVWX
desatar/PRSTVWX
desatibar/PSVWX
desatrancar/PSVWX
descafeinar/PSTVWX
descaminar/PSVWX
descarbonatar/PSVWX
descobajar/PSVWX
descolmillar/PSVWX
desconsolar/HNPRSTWX
descoyuntar/IPRSTVWX
desdentar/PSVX
desembridar/PSVWX
desempalagar/PSVWX
desenartar/PSVWX
desenfardelar/PSVX
desengoznar/PSVWX
desenhebrar/PSVX
desentumecer/IOQRTWX
desfigurar/HIPRSTVWX
desfilachar/PSVWX
desgonzar/PSVX
deshollinar/PSVWX
desinfartar/PRSTVWX
desintoxicar/HPSVWX
desmamparar/PSVWX
desmesurar/PSVWX
desmigar/PSTVWX
desonzar/PSVWX
despaldillar/PSVWX
desparedar/PSVWX
despenolar/PSVX
despilarar/IPSVWX
desprivatizar/HPSTVWX
desquilatar/PSVWX
destachonar/PSVX
desudar/HPSVWX
desusar/PSVWX
desvastigar/PSVWX
difamar/HPSVWX
dilatar/HNPRSTVWX
dilucidar/HPSTVWX
dividir/OQRTUVWX
doñear/PSVWX
domeñar/PSTVWX
electrolizar/HPSVWX
elevar/HIPRSTUVX
embarbascar/PRSVWX
embolsar/PRSTVWX
embullar/PSVWX
empalizar/PSVWX
empalomar/PSVWX
empilonar/PSVX
empizarrar/PSVWX
enastillar/PSVWX
encabrahigar/PSVWX
encajetillar/PSVWX
encaprichar/PRSVWX
encariñar/PRSTVWX
encauchar/PSVWX
enchilar/PSVWX
enclaustrar/PSVWX
encostalar/PSVWX
encrasar/PSVWX
encurtir/VWX
enflorecer/WX
engañar/PRSTVWX
engalgar/PSVWX
engorgoritar/PSVWX
enguillotar/PRSVWX
enhastillar/PSVWX
enjorguinar/PRSVWX
enllantar/PSVWX
enmugrar/PSVWX
ennoblecer/IOQRTWX
enriostrar/PSTVX
ensalobrar/PSVWX
ensortijar/IPSVWX
entamar/PSVWX
entreverar/PRSTVWX
entrizar/PSVWX
entubar/HPSVWX
equipar/IPRSVWX
esbinzar/PSVWX
escarapelar/PSVX
escarcuñar/PSVWX
escofinar/PSVWX
escudriñar/IPSTVWX
esparvar/PSVWX
espillar/PSVWX
esterilizar/HPRSTUVWX
estirar/IPRSTUVWX
excoriar/HPRSTUVX
exentar/PRSTUVX
exhibir/HOQRTUVWX
faldear/PRSTUVWX
fardar/PSVWX
fintar/PSVWX
flirtear/PSVWX
fortalecer/IOQRTWX
fundir/HOQRTUVWX
gargarizar/PSVWX
gentilizar/PSTVWX
golpear/PRSTUVWX
guapear/PSVWX
haldear/PSVWX
hermosear/IPSVWX
herretear/PSVWX
hociquear/PSTVWX
hurgar/IPSTVWX
incensar/HPSVX
incumbir/VWX
indoctrinar/PSTVWX
instituir/OQWY
interrelacionar/PRSTVX
italianizar/PRSVWX
jaquear/PSVWX
lamprear/PSVWX
lanzar/AIPRSTUVWX
levar/LPSVX
lividecer/WX
machucar/IPSVWX
malignar/PSVWX
manar/PSVWX
marizar/PRSVWX
mayear/PSVWX
merendar/PSWX
miañar/PSVWX
molliznar/PSVWX
monopolizar/HPSVWX
musir/ORVWX
nacionalizar/HPRSTVWX
obsesionar/PRSVX
ocalear/PSVWX
ovar/HLPSVWX
paladear/PRSTVWX
parcelar/HPSVX
patentizar/PSVWX
percudir/VWX
personalizar/PSTVWX
peticionar/PSTVX
planchar/PSVWX
polcar/PSVX
potar/HPSVWX
prebendar/PSVX
producir/LOQRTUWX
promiscuar/HPSVX
pugnar/LPSVWX
quedar/PRSVWX
rastrojar/PSVWX
ratificar/HPRSTVWX
reavivar/HPRSTVWX
recalcitrar/LPSVWX
recrear/HPRSTVWX
recriminar/HPRSVWX
redilear/PSVWX
refringir/WX
relejar/PSVWX
reluchar/PSVWX
remachar/PSVWX
repodrir/VWX
resecar/HPSVWX
resegar/PSVX
restallar/PSVWX
rezurcir/QTVWX
rizar/PRSTVWX
rugar/PSVWX
sangrar/LPSVWX
secuestrar/HPSVWX
sisar/PSTVWX
sobrehilar/PSWX
solemnizar/PSVWX
substantivar/PSVWX
sudar/LPSVWX
tablear/PSVWX
testear/PSTVWX
testificar/HPSTVWX
tornear/LPSTVWX
trasferir/TVX
traspellar/PSVWX
travesar/PSVX
ufanar/PRSVWX
varetear/PSVWX
vejar/HPSTVWX
volear/PSVWX
